Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.52.050

Other crime in committing burglary punishable.

Every person who, in the commission of a burglary shall commit any other crime, may be punished therefor as well as for the burglary, and may be prosecuted for each crime separately.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.52.050.]